Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-2207.07
Completed application, defined.

Completed application means an application for credentialing has been processed, all statutory requirements for a credential to be awarded have been met by the applicant, and all required documentation is submitted to the board for final consideration.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2210.03;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 15.
August 30, 2015